Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
FILING DOCUMENTS

Law reviews:

For article, "Business Entity Legislation 2002: Filing Procedures and LL

C

C

hanges", see 31 Colo. Law. 55 (Nov. 2002); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Filing Requirements and Customs in Colorado--Part I", see 41 Colo. Law. 57 (Nov. 2012); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Filing Requirements and Customs in Colorado--Part II", see 41 Colo. Law. 25 (Dec. 2012).

7-90-301. Filing requirements.

Each document that is required or permitted to be filed in the records of the secretary of state pursuant to any provision of this title or any organic statute of this state shall be subject to this part 3.

To be entitled to be filed pursuant to this part 3, a document shall be subject to this part 3 and shall comply with the requirements of this section and the requirements of any other law of this state that adds to or varies the requirements of this part 3.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1475, § 208, effective July 1, 2004.)

Any provision in this title or any other organic statute of this state that provides for filing of a document with the secretary of state or with the office of the secretary of state or in the records of the secretary of state shall be deemed to mean delivery of the document to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to this part 3.

Notwithstanding the general recognition in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section of requirements of other law of this state that may add to or vary the requirements of this part 3, and notwithstanding any other provision of this title or any other organic statute of this state requiring the signature of any person on, or execution by any person of, a document, no such signature or execution shall be required as a condition to its being filed pursuant to this part 3.

The document shall contain all information required by the law of this state to be contained in the document but, unless otherwise provided by law, shall not contain other information.

The document shall be on or in such medium as may be acceptable to the secretary of state and from which the secretary of state may create a document that contains all of the information stated in the document and that is typewritten or printed on paper. The secretary of state may require that the document be delivered by any one or more means or on or in any one or more media as may be acceptable to the secretary of state. The secretary of state is not required to file a document that is not delivered by a means and in a medium that complies with the requirements then established by the secretary of state for the delivery and filing of documents. If the secretary of state permits a document to be delivered on paper, the document shall be typewritten or machine printed, and the secretary of state may impose reasonable requirements upon the dimensions, legibility, quality, and color of such paper and typewriting or printing and upon the format and other attributes of any document that is delivered electronically. The secretary of state shall ensure, at the earliest practicable time, that delivery of a document subject to this part 3 for filing may be accomplished electronically, without the necessity for the delivery of a physical original document or the image thereof, if all required information is delivered and is readily retrievable from the data delivered. If the delivery of a document subject to this part 3 for filing is required to be accomplished electronically, such document shall not be accompanied by any physical document unless the secretary of state permits such accompaniment.

The document shall be in the English language. The entity name of any entity contained in the document need not be in English if expressed in English letters or arabic or roman numerals.

The document shall state the section or sections of the organic statutes, other than this part 3, pursuant to which it is delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this part 3.

(6.5) to (7.7) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1838, § 90, effective July 1, 2002; p. 1702, § 88, effective October 1, 2002.)

(8) The document must state the true name or true names, and mailing address or mailing addresses, of any one or more of the individuals who cause the document to be delivered for filing, but the document need not state the true name and mailing address of more than one such individual.

(9) The document shall include any form or cover sheet, or both, required pursuant to section

7-90-302

.

(10) The document shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing and shall be accompanied by all required fees.

(11) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1475, § 208, effective July 1, 2004.)

(12) Notwithstanding section

2-4-108

, C.R.S., section

24-11-110

, C.R.S., or any other provision of law, if the last day of a period for filing a document that is authorized or required to be filed by electronic means falls on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or any day the secretary of state's physical office is closed, the period shall expire on such day.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1517, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(1), (2), (3), (6), (8), and (10) amended and (6.5) and (7.7) added, p. 618, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1838, § 90, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1702, § 88, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (3), (4), (6), (8), and (9) amended and (11) added, p. 2288, § 197, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(b.5), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (8), (9), (10), and (11) amended, p. 1475, § 208, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 1207, § 8, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

(10) amended, p. 241, § 27, effective May 29.

L. 2008:

(12) added, p. 24, § 21, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(8) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1920, § 19, effective July 1, 2020.

7-90-301.5. Act of causing document to be delivered for filing.

Causing a document to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this part 3 shall constitute the affirmation or acknowledgment of each individual causing such delivery, under penalties of perjury, that the document is the individual's act and deed, or that the individual in good faith believes the document is the act and deed of the person on whose behalf the individual is causing the document to be delivered for filing, taken in conformity with the requirements of this part 3, the constituent documents, and the organic statutes, and that the individual in good faith believes the facts stated in the document are true and the document complies with the requirements of this part 3, the constituent documents, and the organic statutes.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1477, § 209, effective July 1.

7-90-302. Forms and cover sheets - secretary of state to furnish upon request.

The secretary of state may prepare and furnish a form or cover sheet, or both, for any document that is subject to this part 3 and may require the use of any such form or cover sheet or both. The form or cover sheet may require the statement of any information the secretary of state deems appropriate to perform the duties of the secretary of state under the law of this state, including information as to the identity of any person to which the document relates, the mailing address of any such person, the registered agent name and registered agent address of the registered agent for any such person who is required or permitted by this title to have a registered agent, and the principal office address of the principal office of any such person who has a principal office. A form or cover sheet shall not preclude in any way the inclusion in any document of any item the inclusion of which is not prohibited by the law of this state and shall not require the inclusion of any item the inclusion of which is not required or permitted by this article or any other law of this state.

The form or cover sheet shall be deemed to be a part of the filed document that uses such form or cover sheet. Information that is contained in such form or cover sheet shall control over any contrary information contained elsewhere in the filed document.

The secretary of state shall furnish, on request, any form or cover sheet that the secretary of state requires to be used pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1518, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 620, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1840, § 91, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1705, § 89, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2290, § 198, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1477, § 210, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 870, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 241, § 28, effective May 29.

7-90-303. Filing, service, and copying fees - subpoenas.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect fees and other charges, which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section

24-21-104 (3)

, C.R.S., for:

Issuing any certificate;

Furnishing any information;

Furnishing a copy of any filed document; or

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1477, § 211, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2290, § 199, effective July 1, 2004.)

Processing any document delivered to the secretary of state for filing as required or permitted under part 3 of article 18 of title 6 or part 10 of article 16 of title 10 or part 3 of article 33.3 of title 38, C.R.S., or this title.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect, at the time of service of any subpoena upon the secretary of state or any deputy or employee of the secretary of state's office, a fee of fifty dollars and an allowance of ten dollars for meals and a charge for mileage at the rate prescribed by section 24-9-104, C.R.S., for each mile from the state capitol building to the place named in the subpoena. The fee shall be paid to the secretary of state; the meal allowance and mileage charge shall be paid to the person named in the subpoena. If the person named in the subpoena is required to appear at the place named in the subpoena for more than one day, the person shall be paid in advance a per diem allowance of forty-four dollars for each day of attendance in addition to any other fees, allowances, and charges.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee or allowance in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the secretary of state may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees or allowances if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees or allowances is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the secretary of state by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees or allowances as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect all other fees and penalties imposed by or assessed in accordance with the law of this state.

In all cases where fees or charges are imposed under this article, the fee shall include indexing and filing of the document and providing all copies required to be provided by the secretary of state in connection with the filing and shall include affixing the seal of the secretary of state upon any certified copy.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1518, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 1323, § 20, effective June 1; (1)(f) and (3) amended, p. 620, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(b) to (1)(d) and (4) amended, p. 1841, § 92, effective July 1; (1)(b) to (1)(d) and (4) amended, p. 1705, § 90, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(e) and (3) amended, p. 2290, § 199, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(c), (1)(d), and (2) amended, p. 1477, § 211, effective July 1; (1)(f) amended, p. 1010, § 20, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(1)(f) amended, p. 870, § 48, effective July 1.

7-90-304. Effective time and date of filed document.

Except as provided in subsection (2) or (4) of this section, a document that is filed by the secretary of state is effective:

If no time is stated in the filed document as its effective time, then at the time of filing on the date it is filed, as evidenced by the records of the secretary of state; or

If a time is stated in the filed document as its effective time, then at the later of the stated time on the date it is filed, as such date is stated in the records of the secretary of state, or the time the filed document is filed by the secretary of state, as such time is stated in the records of the secretary of state.

A filed document may state a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the filed document becomes effective at the later of the time and date so stated or the time and date the filed document is filed by the secretary of state, as such time and date are stated in the records of the secretary of state. If a filed document states a delayed effective date but not a time, the filed document is effective at the later of 11:59 p.m. on that date or the time and date the filed document is filed by the secretary of state, as such time and date are stated in the records of the secretary of state. If a filed document states a delayed effective date that is later than the ninetieth day after the date the filed document is filed, the filed document is effective at 11:59 p.m. on the ninetieth day after it is filed. A filed document may state the order in which the matters provided for in the filed document are deemed to have occurred. This subsection (2) may be limited by other provisions of this title. In the event of conflict between this subsection (2) and any other provision of this title, such other provision of this title controls.

If a filed document states a delayed effective date pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the filed document may be prevented from becoming effective if a person to which the filed document relates delivers to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to this part 3, on or before the earlier of the stated effective date of the document or the ninetieth day after the filed document was filed, a statement of correction revoking the filed document.

If two or more documents are simultaneously delivered to the secretary of state, each of the documents shall be deemed to have been filed simultaneously if each identifies, to the satisfaction of the secretary of state, all of the documents that are to be deemed to have been filed simultaneously and states that all of such documents are to be deemed to have been filed simultaneously. All of such documents shall be deemed to have been filed at the time and on the date of filing of the first of such documents to be filed, as such time and date are evidenced by the records of the secretary of state. If any of such documents is rejected by the secretary of state, all of such documents shall be deemed to have been rejected by the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1519, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 98:

IP(3) amended, p. 620, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), and IP(3) amended, p. 1841, § 93, effective July 1; (1), (2), and IP(3) amended, p. 1705, § 91, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2290, § 200, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(b), (2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1478, § 212, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 871, § 49, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1132, § 13, effective May 14.

7-90-304.5. Restated constituent filed document.

Unless the organic statutes expressly provide otherwise:

A domestic entity may restate its constituent filed document at any time by action of its owners or of any other person authorized by the organic statutes to deliver, on behalf of the entity, articles of restatement to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to this part 3, effecting such restatement.

Articles of restatement of a constituent filed document may include one or more amendments to the constituent filed document if each amendment to the constituent filed document has been approved in the manner provided in the organic statutes. Such an amendment may:

Delete the statement of the names and addresses of the incorporators or other persons forming the entity;

Delete the statement of the names and addresses of the initial managers of the entity;

Delete the statement of the names and addresses of any or all of the individuals named in the constituent filed document, pursuant to section

7-90-301 (6)

, as being individuals who caused the constituent filed document to be delivered for filing;

Delete the statement of the principal office address of the entity; and

If a statement of change changing the registered agent name and registered agent address of the registered agent of the entity is on file in the records of the secretary of state, delete the statement of the registered agent name and registered agent address of the initial registered agent of the entity.

An entity restating its constituent filed document shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to this part 3, articles of restatement stating:

The entity name of the entity; and

The text of the restated constituent filed document.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1479, § 213, effective July 1, 2004.)

Upon filing of articles of restatement of a constituent filed document by the secretary of state or at any delayed effective date provided in the articles of restatement, determined pursuant to section

7-90-304

, the constituent filed document as restated by the articles of restatement supersedes the original constituent filed document and all prior amendments to the original constituent filed document.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 620, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), IP(1)(c), and (1)(c)(I) amended, p. 2291, § 201, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(1), (1)(a), IP(1)(b), (1)(b)(V), IP(1)(c), (1)(c)(I), and (1)(c)(III) amended, p. 1479, § 213, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a), IP(1)(b), IP(1)(c), and (1)(d) amended, p. 871, § 50, effective July 1.

7-90-305. Correcting filed document.

A person may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to this part 3, a statement of correction to:

Correct a filed document if the filed document contains information that was incorrect at the time the document was delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this part 3; or

Revoke a filed document pursuant to section 7-90-304 (3) or revoke a filed document that was delivered to the secretary of state for filing in error.

A statement of correction:

[Editor's note: This version of paragraph (a) is effective until ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)] Shall state the entity name of the entity to which the document relates or, if the entity to which the document relates does not have an entity name, shall state the true name of the entity, or, in the case of a trade name, shall state the trade name and the name of the person transacting business or conducting activities under such name, or, in the case of a statement of trademark registration or any other document relating to a statement of trademark registration, shall identify the statement of trademark registration in a manner satisfactory to the secretary of state;

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of paragraph (a) is effective ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)

]

Shall state the entity name of the entity to which the document relates or, if the entity to which the document relates does not have an entity name, shall state the true name of the entity, or, in the case of a trade name, shall state the trade name and the name of the person transacting business or conducting activities under such name, or, in the case of a statement of trademark registration or any other document relating to a statement of trademark registration, shall identify the statement of trademark registration in a manner satisfactory to the secretary of state, or, in the case of a commercial registered agent, shall state the name of the commercial registered agent as reflected in the records of the secretary of state;

Shall identify the filed document to the satisfaction of the secretary of state;

Shall state the information, if any, contained in the filed document to be corrected;

Shall state each such correction;

Shall state each addition or deletion of information, if any; and

Must, if it revokes a filed document, state that the filed document is revoked either pursuant to section 7-90-304 (3) or because the filed document was delivered to the secretary of state for filing in error, whichever is applicable.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2292, § 202, effective July 1, 2004.)

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (4), a statement of correction is effective on the effective date of the filed document it corrects or revokes as such date is stated in the records of the secretary of state. As to persons relying on the filed document before it is corrected or revoked and adversely affected by the correction or revocation, a statement of correction is effective when filed. A statement of correction that corrects the effective date of a filed document to an earlier date is effective on such earlier date or on the date the filed document was filed in the records of the secretary of state as such date is stated in the records of the secretary of state, whichever is later. A statement of correction may not state a delayed effective date for the effectiveness of the statement of correction itself.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1519, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 621, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1), (2)(b), (2)(c), and (3) amended, p. 1841, § 94, effective July 1; (1), (2)(b), (2)(c), and (3) amended, p. 1706, § 92, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2292, § 202, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 1480, § 214, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 1207, § 9, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(2)(a) amended, p. 872, § 51, effective May 30; (2)(a) amended, p. 118, § 2, effective May 29, 2007.

L. 2007:

(1)(a), (2)(c), and (2)(d) amended and (2)(d.5) added, p. 241, § 29, effective May 29.

L. 2012:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 12-123), ch. 171, p. 611, § 3, effective (see editor's note).

L. 2016:

(1)(b), (2)(e), and (4) amended, (HB 16-1330), ch. 240, p. 984, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Section 10 of chapter 171, Session Laws of Colorado 2012, provides that the act amending subsection (2)(a) is effective ninety days following certification in writing by the secretary of state to the revisor of statutes that the secretary of state has implemented the necessary computer system changes to implement said subsection. As of publication date, the revisor of statutes had not received certification from the secretary of state.

7-90-305.5. Statement of change.

A person may amend, cancel, revoke, or otherwise change a filed document if circumstances occur after the filing of the filed document by the secretary of state that make it appropriate that the filed document be changed.

A filed document is changed by causing to be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to this part 3, a statement of change that:

[Editor's note: This version of paragraph (a) is effective until ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)] States the entity name of the entity to which the document relates or, if the entity to which the document relates does not have an entity name, states the true name of the entity, or, in the case of a trade name, states the trade name and the name of the person transacting business or conducting activities under such name, or, in the case of a statement of trademark registration or any document relating to a statement of trademark registration, identifies the statement of trademark registration in a manner satisfactory to the secretary of state;

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of paragraph (a) is effective ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)

]

States the entity name of the entity to which the document relates or, if the entity to which the document relates does not have an entity name, states the true name of the entity, or, in the case of a trade name, states the trade name and the name of the person transacting business or conducting activities under such name, or, in the case of a statement of trademark registration or any document relating to a statement of trademark registration, identifies the statement of trademark registration in a manner satisfactory to the secretary of state, or, in the case of a commercial registered agent, states the name of the commercial registered agent as reflected in the records of the secretary of state;

Identifies the filed document to the satisfaction of the secretary of state;

States the information, if any, contained in the filed document that is to be changed;

States each such change;

States each addition or deletion of information, if any; and

Complies with all other requirements of this title applicable to the statement of change.

If a person is specifically permitted or required by an organic statute other than this article to amend, cancel, revoke, or otherwise change a filed document, it may amend, cancel, revoke, or otherwise change such filed document only in accordance with such organic statute unless that organic statute or another organic statute other than this article also permits the amendment, cancellation, revocation, or other change to be effected by a statement of change pursuant to this section.

A statement of change and the change it effects in a filed document become effective as provided in section 7-90-304.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2293, § 203, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1481, § 215, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2)(a) amended, p. 872, § 52, effective May 30; (2)(a) amended, p. 118, § 3, effective May 29, 2007.

L. 2012:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 12-123), ch. 171, p. 612, § 4, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

Section 10 of chapter 171, Session Laws of Colorado 2012, provides that the act amending subsection (2)(a) is effective ninety days following certification in writing by the secretary of state to the revisor of statutes that the secretary of state has implemented the necessary computer system changes to implement said subsection. As of publication date, the revisor of statutes had not received certification from the secretary of state.

7-90-306. Filing duty of secretary of state - manner of filing - definition.

If a document delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this part 3 complies with the requirements of section 7-90-301, the secretary of state shall file it. The secretary of state has no duty to determine whether the document complies with any or all requirements of any law.

The secretary of state files a document by marking or otherwise associating the words "secretary of state" and the time and date of filing on or with the document and by placing the document in records that the secretary of state shall maintain to contain all filed documents. The records of filed documents that the secretary of state maintains shall be such that any filed document may be retrieved by the secretary of state in perceivable form and with the time and date of its filing.

If the secretary of state permits a document to be delivered in a physical medium and the secretary of state refuses to file the document, the secretary of state shall return it to any individual who has been identified, pursuant to section 7-90-301 (8), as having caused the document to be delivered for filing at the address provided for that individual, together with a notice providing a brief explanation of the reason for the refusal, within ten days after the document was delivered to the secretary of state; except that no return or notice is required with respect to a periodic report that the secretary of state has refused to file.

The secretary of state's duty to file documents under this title is ministerial. The filing of or refusal to file a document does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or in part;

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document; or

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

Notwithstanding the foregoing or any other provision of law, the secretary of state may, upon receipt of a written request from and a showing of good cause by an authorized person supported by such validating, verifying, and authenticating documents as the secretary of state may require, remove personal identifying information from the publicly accessible documents and other records of the secretary of state maintained pursuant to this section where such information is not required by law to be included in such documents and records.

A document or record from which the secretary of state removes personal identifying information pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) shall not be rendered insufficient or ineffective by such removal notwithstanding any other provision of law.

The secretary of state may retain the original or a copy of a document or record that contains personal identifying information, but such a document or record shall be open for inspection, and copies or printouts of the document or record or information from the document or record shall be furnished only upon application to the secretary of state and only for good cause shown notwithstanding any provision of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S., or any other provision of law.

For the purposes of this section, "personal identifying information" means information about an individual that could reasonably be used to identify such individual, including, but not limited to:

A social security number;

A personal identification number;

A password; or

A pass code.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1520, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 622, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), and IP(4) amended, p. 1842, § 95, effective July 1; (1), (2), and IP(4) amended, p. 1706, § 93, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 2294, § 204, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1481, § 216, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(5) and (6) added, p. 847, § 5, effective June 1; (3) amended, p. 1208, § 10, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1996, § 13, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 162, § 4, effective April 19.

7-90-307. Appeal from secretary of state's refusal to file document.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document delivered to the secretary of state for filing, the person causing the document to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing may, within forty-five days after the effective date of the notice of the refusal given by the secretary of state pursuant to section 7-90-306 (3), appeal to the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the entity's principal office is located, or, if the entity has no principal office in this state, to the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the entity has no registered agent, to the district court for the city and county of Denver. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel the filing of the document by the secretary of state and by attaching to the petition a copy of the document and a copy of the secretary of state's notice of refusal.

The court may order the secretary of state to file the document or to take such other action as the court considers appropriate.

The court's order or decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1521, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2294, § 205, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1482, § 217, effective July 1.

7-90-308. Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate attached to a copy of a document, bearing the secretary of state's manual or facsimile signature and the seal of this state and stating to the effect that the document is filed in the records of the secretary of state, is prima facie evidence that the document is on file in the records of the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1521, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1842, § 96, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1707, § 94, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2295, § 206, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1482, § 218, effective July 1.

7-90-309. Certificates issued by secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall issue to any person, upon request, a copy of any document filed by the secretary of state pursuant to this title, a certificate endorsed on or accompanying a copy of any filed document identifying the filed document and certifying that the copy is a true copy of the filed document, and, if appropriate, a certificate of good standing concerning any entity. The secretary of state may issue to any person, upon request, any other certificate as to the records of the secretary of state that the secretary of state deems appropriate.

A certificate issued by the secretary of state may be relied upon, subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, as prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1521, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1843, § 97, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1707, § 95, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2295, § 207, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1482, § 219, effective July 1.

7-90-310. Proof of delivery for filing.

The secretary of state may consider a document to have been received for filing upon proof of such receipt as evidenced by a signed return receipt, an entry in records maintained by the secretary of state of electronic or facsimile transmissions received by the secretary of state, or such other or additional proof of receipt of the documents received as the secretary of state may require. Such proof must be satisfactory to the secretary of state before the document will be considered received.

The secretary of state may require that the receipt of a document by facsimile transmission on or after February 11, 1994, be shown in the records of the secretary of state of facsimile transmissions received by the secretary of state. The secretary of state may condition relief under this section upon fulfillment of such other requirements or conditions that the secretary of state determines appropriate, including, without limitation, the making of a change of entity name of the entity involved and payment of fees for the filing.

Application for relief under this section shall be made in writing and delivered to the secretary of state within sixty days after the purported date of receipt of such document by the secretary of state. The application shall contain information satisfactory to the secretary of state to enable the secretary of state to identify the transaction.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1521, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 622, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1483, § 220, effective July 1.

7-90-311. Powers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1522, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 622, § 23, effective July 1.

7-90-312. Restated constituent filed documents. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 1522, § 21, effective June 3.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 617, § 3, effective August 4.

7-90-313. Remedy for failure or refusal to file - presumptions.

Any person who is adversely affected by a failure or refusal of any other person to deliver any document to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to this part 3, with respect to any entity may petition the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the entity's principal office is located or, if the entity has no principal office in this state, in the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the entity has no registered agent, in the city and county of Denver, to approve the document and direct the appropriate person to deliver the document to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to this part 3. If the court finds that it is proper for the document to be filed and that there has been a failure or refusal to approve the document and deliver the document to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this part 3, it shall order the secretary of state to file the document in the form it has approved.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2295, § 208, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1483, § 221, effective July 1.